engnoun.lexc
!!!engnoun.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] [Guess] +N +3sg +3pl +CON +GEN

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Constant
[stem]+CON:0	#;

LEXICON Ninf

[stem]+N+3sg:0   #;
[stem]+N+3pl:^s  #;
[stem]+N+3sg+GEN:^'s  #;
[stem]+N+3pl+GEN:^s'  #;
[stem]+N+3pl+GEN:^s's  #;

LEXICON Ninf_NoPl

[stem]+N+3sg:0   #;
[stem]+N+3sg+GEN:^'s  #;

LEXICON Noun
Arabic Ninf_NoPl;
Blighty Ninf_NoPl;
Calvinism Ninf_NoPl;
Chartism Ninf_NoPl;
Co Ninf_NoPl;
Dominican Ninf;
Duce Ninf_NoPl;
Esperanto Ninf_NoPl;
Flemish Ninf_NoPl;
Gorgonzola Ninf_NoPl;
Hinduism Ninf_NoPl;
Irish Ninf_NoPl;
Khalka Ninf_NoPl;
M Ninf;
Manx Ninf_NoPl;
McCarthyism Ninf_NoPl;
Mme Ninf_NoPl;
Mrs Ninf_NoPl;
Nazism Ninf_NoPl;
Pashto Ninf_NoPl;
Polaroid Ninf_NoPl;
Roentgen Ninf;
Romaic Ninf_NoPl;
Sango Ninf_NoPl;
Setswana Ninf_NoPl;
Siswati Ninf_NoPl;
Swahili Ninf_NoPl;
TNT Ninf_NoPl;
Turkish Ninf_NoPl;
Welsh Ninf_NoPl;
Zionist Ninf;
abstemiousness Ninf_NoPl;
abstriction Ninf;
achiever Ninf;
addict Ninf;
advances Ninf_NoPl;
advowson Ninf;
affairs Ninf_NoPl;
afters Ninf;
air-sickness Ninf_NoPl;
airlessness Ninf;
alimentation Ninf;
alms-giving Ninf_NoPl;
alternator Ninf;
amoebocyte Ninf;
anarchist Ninf;
ankle Ninf;
anopheles Ninf_NoPl;
anticatalyst Ninf;
antitrades Ninf_NoPl;
aphrodisiac Ninf;
apron Ninf;
archives Ninf_NoPl;
argol Ninf;
arrogance Ninf_NoPl;
artifice Ninf;
ashes Ninf_NoPl;
associate Ninf;
atabrine Ninf_NoPl;
attenuant Ninf;
automata Ninf;
avidity Ninf_NoPl;
babble Ninf;
badness Ninf_NoPl;
bailment Ninf;
balls Ninf_NoPl;
bank-draft Ninf;
barricade Ninf;
bathers Ninf_NoPl;
bawler Ninf;
bedclothes Ninf_NoPl;
beefiness Ninf;
belongings Ninf_NoPl;
benison Ninf;
bidding Ninf;
bilge-water Ninf_NoPl;
billy-o Ninf_NoPl;
biology Ninf;
black-lead Ninf_NoPl;
blackbuck Ninf;
blinks Ninf_NoPl;
blockade-runner Ninf;
bloodlust Ninf_NoPl;
boardwalk Ninf;
bone-head Ninf;
bongos Ninf_NoPl;
botargo Ninf;
boules Ninf_NoPl;
bracelets Ninf_NoPl;
bract Ninf;
brain-fag Ninf_NoPl;
breechloader Ninf;
briefs Ninf_NoPl;
brock Ninf;
buckskins Ninf_NoPl;
buckwheat Ninf;
bunches Ninf_NoPl;
bunyip Ninf;
butterfly Ninf;
bye-byes Ninf_NoPl;
cadence Ninf;
caltrop Ninf;
calvities Ninf_NoPl;
candlepins Ninf_NoPl;
cannoneer Ninf;
car-sickness Ninf_NoPl;
carbene Ninf;
carrefour Ninf;
catachresis Ninf;
cates Ninf_NoPl;
cavalla Ninf;
celluloid Ninf_NoPl;
centuplicate Ninf;
chain-mail Ninf_NoPl;
chalybite Ninf;
charades Ninf_NoPl;
chasseur Ninf;
cheese Ninf_NoPl;
chevet Ninf;
chewing-gum Ninf_NoPl;
chit-chat Ninf_NoPl;
chital Ninf;
chromaticity Ninf;
cine-camera Ninf;
civies Ninf_NoPl;
clandestineness Ninf;
claw-back Ninf_NoPl;
client Ninf;
clock-watching Ninf_NoPl;
cnidarian Ninf;
coal-gas Ninf_NoPl;
cobwebs Ninf_NoPl;
cocoa Ninf;
collaborator Ninf;
colonization Ninf_NoPl;
combination-lock Ninf;
companionableness Ninf;
completion Ninf_NoPl;
concept Ninf;
confirmation Ninf;
consciousness Ninf_NoPl;
consignor Ninf;
continence Ninf_NoPl;
contractor Ninf;
cooperator Ninf;
corduroys Ninf_NoPl;
cornetist Ninf;
costermonger Ninf;
cotton-wool Ninf_NoPl;
coupler Ninf;
courses Ninf_NoPl;
cranberry Ninf;
craps Ninf_NoPl;
crib-biting Ninf;
cross-talk Ninf_NoPl;
crossness Ninf;
cruse Ninf_NoPl;
crystallography Ninf;
cupboard-love Ninf_NoPl;
curettage Ninf;
cyclonite Ninf;
dailies Ninf_NoPl;
damageability Ninf;
darts Ninf_NoPl;
daydreamer Ninf;
daylights Ninf_NoPl;
decelerator Ninf;
defecator Ninf;
delayed-action Ninf_NoPl;
demos Ninf_NoPl;
denominative Ninf;
dermis Ninf;
detonator Ninf;
diarrhea Ninf_NoPl;
difference Ninf;
dingbats Ninf_NoPl;
discoid Ninf;
discomposure Ninf_NoPl;
distastefulness Ninf;
dividers Ninf_NoPl;
doings Ninf_NoPl;
don't-know Ninf;
double-talk Ninf_NoPl;
drainpipes Ninf_NoPl;
dregs Ninf_NoPl;
dressing-down Ninf;
drift-wood Ninf_NoPl;
dues Ninf_NoPl;
dwarfishness Ninf;
earnest-money Ninf_NoPl;
ecospecies Ninf_NoPl;
effervescence Ninf;
embargo Ninf;
enfilade Ninf;
entrance-money Ninf_NoPl;
episcope Ninf;
ethanediol Ninf;
exasperation Ninf_NoPl;
exegesis Ninf;
extractions Ninf_NoPl;
eyelash Ninf;
eyes Ninf_NoPl;
fall-out Ninf_NoPl;
fatback Ninf;
fearlessness Ninf_NoPl;
ferromanganese Ninf_NoPl;
fibrinolysin Ninf;
finis Ninf_NoPl;
fire-power Ninf_NoPl;
fire-water Ninf_NoPl;
firsts Ninf_NoPl;
fist Ninf;
flatulence Ninf_NoPl;
floss Ninf;
fondness Ninf_NoPl;
foregut Ninf;
forequarters Ninf_NoPl;
franklinite Ninf;
frost-bite Ninf_NoPl;
fun Ninf;
funds Ninf_NoPl;
galluses Ninf_NoPl;
gaming-table Ninf;
genitive Ninf;
gills Ninf_NoPl;
glassine Ninf;
godhead Ninf_NoPl;
gold-leaf Ninf_NoPl;
gong Ninf;
good-neighbourliness Ninf_NoPl;
goose-flesh Ninf_NoPl;
grease-paint Ninf_NoPl;
greatcoat Ninf;
grits Ninf_NoPl;
grouts Ninf_NoPl;
guilloche Ninf;
gun-metal Ninf_NoPl;
hair's-breadth Ninf;
half-pay Ninf_NoPl;
handwork Ninf_NoPl;
hardiness Ninf;
headphones Ninf_NoPl;
heat-stroke Ninf_NoPl;
heavy-handedness Ninf;
hesitance Ninf_NoPl;
heterograft Ninf;
hipsters Ninf_NoPl;
holdfast Ninf;
horrors Ninf_NoPl;
horse-sense Ninf_NoPl;
hostelry Ninf;
hunks Ninf_NoPl;
hydrogenator Ninf;
ichthyolite Ninf;
immoveables Ninf_NoPl;
imperfection Ninf;
inconsiderableness Ninf;
indigence Ninf_NoPl;
infernality Ninf;
insinuation Ninf;
intemperance Ninf_NoPl;
intersection Ninf;
ironsides Ninf_NoPl;
irruption Ninf;
jakes Ninf_NoPl;
jettison Ninf;
kanzu Ninf;
kingliness Ninf_NoPl;
kite-balloon Ninf;
lactose Ninf;
lamp-black Ninf_NoPl;
latecomer Ninf;
lazy-bones Ninf_NoPl;
lees Ninf_NoPl;
lenis Ninf;
light-mindedness Ninf_NoPl;
limp Ninf;
listen Ninf_NoPl;
locust-tree Ninf;
lodgings Ninf_NoPl;
love-making Ninf_NoPl;
ludo Ninf;
magnetometry Ninf;
manganese Ninf_NoPl;
mannequin Ninf;
mastigophoran Ninf;
materials Ninf_NoPl;
measures Ninf_NoPl;
melilot Ninf;
metencephalon Ninf;
mews Ninf_NoPl;
millboard Ninf;
mischief-making Ninf_NoPl;
mistaker Ninf;
monology Ninf;
mooneye Ninf_NoPl;
mountebankery Ninf;
mutant Ninf;
near-sightedness Ninf;
neatness Ninf_NoPl;
niche Ninf;
night-soil Ninf_NoPl;
non-alignment Ninf_NoPl;
nonchalance Ninf_NoPl;
normal Ninf;
notes Ninf_NoPl;
obligingness Ninf;
obscurantism Ninf_NoPl;
olfaction Ninf;
omnipotence Ninf_NoPl;
organographist Ninf;
orrisroot Ninf_NoPl;
ovenware Ninf;
over-production Ninf_NoPl;
palaeontologist Ninf;
paleontology Ninf_NoPl;
panty-hose Ninf_NoPl;
parasiticide Ninf;
pas Ninf_NoPl;
patroon Ninf;
peanuts Ninf_NoPl;
pennywort Ninf;
persuasiveness Ninf;
pervasion Ninf_NoPl;
photoconductivity Ninf;
pilaff Ninf_NoPl;
pile Ninf;
plankton Ninf;
plasticine Ninf_NoPl;
pocketful Ninf;
point-duty Ninf_NoPl;
pooftah Ninf;
populism Ninf_NoPl;
powder-magazine Ninf;
present-day Ninf;
prize-money Ninf_NoPl;
professional Ninf;
protoxylem Ninf;
punter Ninf;
pyorrhoea Ninf_NoPl;
quarrier Ninf;
radio-therapy Ninf_NoPl;
radiogram Ninf;
ravelment Ninf;
redbreast Ninf;
relations Ninf_NoPl;
reluctance Ninf;
resistiveness Ninf;
rhesus Ninf;
riff-raff Ninf_NoPl;
roarer Ninf;
rock-salt Ninf_NoPl;
rub-a-dub Ninf_NoPl;
rubber Ninf;
saint's-day Ninf;
sanies Ninf_NoPl;
sasin Ninf;
schmooze Ninf;
scrapiness Ninf_NoPl;
sea Ninf;
sea-water Ninf_NoPl;
self-communion Ninf_NoPl;
self-knowledge Ninf;
servomotor Ninf;
sessions Ninf_NoPl;
shell-shock Ninf_NoPl;
shiftiness Ninf;
show-business Ninf_NoPl;
sick Ninf;
sideboards Ninf_NoPl;
sitology Ninf;
skating Ninf_NoPl;
sleeping-sickness Ninf_NoPl;
slip-on Ninf;
snips Ninf_NoPl;
snootiness Ninf;
soother Ninf;
sorites Ninf_NoPl;
spade-work Ninf_NoPl;
speed-boat Ninf;
splits Ninf_NoPl;
sporophyll Ninf;
stagnation Ninf_NoPl;
stand-point Ninf;
stays Ninf_NoPl;
sticker Ninf;
stockinette Ninf_NoPl;
straphanging Ninf;
strip-lighting Ninf_NoPl;
subduction Ninf;
sugar-cane Ninf_NoPl;
summarizer Ninf;
superintendence Ninf_NoPl;
surrogateship Ninf;
swiz Ninf_NoPl;
synarchy Ninf;
table-ware Ninf_NoPl;
tan Ninf;
tap-dancing Ninf_NoPl;
teens Ninf_NoPl;
teetotalism Ninf;
terra-cotta Ninf_NoPl;
testament Ninf;
thirteenth Ninf;
ticker-tape Ninf_NoPl;
timelessness Ninf;
tonsure Ninf;
torques Ninf_NoPl;
traditionalism Ninf;
transparence Ninf_NoPl;
trepanner Ninf;
tropic Ninf;
trumps Ninf_NoPl;
turnsole Ninf;
uncertainty Ninf;
underclothes Ninf_NoPl;
unquiet Ninf;
vacuousness Ninf;
validity Ninf_NoPl;
verbalization Ninf;
villeinage Ninf_NoPl;
virologist Ninf;
wait-a-bit Ninf;
wares Ninf_NoPl;
wateriness Ninf;
well-water Ninf_NoPl;
whiffletree Ninf;
whites Ninf_NoPl;
winner Ninf;
wolf's-bane Ninf_NoPl;
worthlessness Ninf;
writing-paper Ninf_NoPl;
zealousness Ninf;
